Utah statutes.
53A-3-409.   Local governmental entities and school districts -- Contracts
and cooperation -- Disbursement of funds -- Municipal and county
representative participation in school district board meetings -- Notice
required.
(1)  Local governmental entities and school districts may contract and
cooperate with one another in matters affecting the health, welfare,
education, and convenience of the inhabitants within their respective
territorial limits.
(2)  A local governmental entity may disburse public funds in aid of a school
district located wholly or partially within the limits of its jurisdiction.
(3) (a)  A mayor or the mayor's designee of a municipality that is partly or
entirely within the boundaries of a school district and the county commission
chair, county executive, or county manager, or their designee, of a county
with unincorporated area within the boundaries of a school district may attend
and participate in the board discussions at the school district's board
meetings.
(b)  Each local school board shall give notice of board meetings to:
(i)  the mayor or the mayor's designee of each municipality that is partly or
entirely within the school district's boundaries; and
(ii)  the county commission chair, county executive, or county manager, or
their designee, of a county with unincorporated area within the school
district's boundaries.
(c)  The notice required under Subsection (3)(b) shall be provided by:
(i)  mail;
(ii)  e-mail; or
(iii)  other effective means agreed to by the person to whom notice is given.
